en: Cork grease form: Jar; Pot; Stick; Tin; Tube; Other
sk-SK: Forma maziva na korky: Dóza; Téglik; Tyčinka; Plechovka; Tuba; Iné
ru: Форма смазки для пробки: Банка; Баночка; Стик; Жестяная банка; Тюбик; Другое
tr: Mantar yağı formu: Kavanoz; Kutu; Çubuk; Teneke; Tüp; Diğer
de: Form des Korkfetts: Dose; Tiegel; Stift; Blechdose; Tube; Andere
fi: Korkkirasvan tuotetyyppi: Purkki; Rasia; Puikko; Peltirasia; Tuubi; Muu
sv: Korkfettform: Burk; Ask; Stift; Plåtburk; Tub; Övrigt
zh-TW: 軟木膏形式: 廣口瓶; 小罐; 條裝; 錫罐; 管裝; 其他
nl: Kurkvet vorm: Pot; Potje; Stick; Blik; Tube; Overige
hr-HR: Oblik masti od pluta: Staklenka; Posudica; Stik; Limena kutijica; Tuba; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kamštinio tepalo forma: Stiklainėlis; Indelis; Lazdelė; Skardinė dėžutė; Tūbelė; Kita
el: Μορφή λιπαντικού φελλού: Βαζάκι; Κουτάκι; Στικ; Τενεκεδάκι; Σωληνάριο; Άλλο
ja: コルクグリースの形状: ジャー; ポット; スティック; 缶; チューブ; その他
pt-PT: Forma de lubrificante de cortiça: Frasco; Boião; Bastão; Lata; Tubo; Outro
es: Forma de grasa de corcho: Tarro; Bote; Barra; Lata; Tubo; Otro
vi: Dạng mỡ bôi trơn bằng nút bần: Hũ; Hũ nhỏ; Thỏi; Hộp thiếc; Tuýp; Khác
bg-BG: Форма на корковата грес: Бурканче; Кутийка; Стик; Метална кутийка; Туба; Други
nb: Korkfettform: Krukke; Boks; Stift; Blikkboks; Tube; Annet
th: รูปแบบจาระบีไม้ก๊อก: กระปุก; ตลับ; แท่ง; ตลับสังกะสี; หลอด; อื่นๆ
fr: Forme de la graisse pour liège: Bocal; Pot; Stick; Boîte métallique; Tube; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika masti za pluto: Lonček; Posodica; Stik; Pločevinasta posodica; Tuba; Drugo
da: Korkfedtform: Krukke; Bøtte; Stift; Dåse; Tube; Andet
ro-RO: Formă grăsime de plută: Borcan; Recipient; Baton; Cutie metalică; Tub; Altele
hu: Parafazsír formátuma: Üveg; Tégely; Rúd; Fémdoboz; Tubus; Egyéb
it: Forma di grasso di sughero: Vasetto; Barattolo; Stick; Scatolina in latta; Tubetto; Altro
cs: Forma mazadla na korek: Dóza; Kelímek; Tyčinka; Plechovka; Tuba; Ostatní
pl: Forma smaru do korka: Słoiczek; Pudełeczko; Sztyft; Puszka; Tubka; Inna
ko: 코르크 그리스 형태: 자(Jar); 팟(Pot); 스틱; 틴; 튜브; 기타
pt-BR: Forma da graxa para cortiça: Pote de vidro; Pote; Bastão; Lata; Tubo; Outros
zh-CN: 软木脂形态: 罐; 小盒; 棒; 铁盒; 软管; 其他